Louisiana, session 2026, HB1014.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The sum of Three Hundred Seventy-Five Thousand and No/100
($375,000.00) Dollars is hereby payable out of the State General Fund (Direct) for Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 for payment of the consent judgment captioned "Angela Melerine, Wife
of/and Eric Melerine, Jr. versus State of Louisiana DOTD, St. Bernard Parish Government,
The Contreras Sanctuary, LLC and Ancient Oaks Holdings, LLC", signed on January 27,
2026, between the state of Louisiana, through the Department of Transportation and
Development, and Angela Melerine, Wife of/and Eric Melerine, Jr., bearing number 19-
0745, Division E, on the docket of the Thirty-Fourth Judicial District, parish of St. Bernard,
state of Louisiana.
Section 2. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of this Act, an amount equal to
the sum of Three Hundred Thirty-Seven Thousand Five Hundred and No/100 ($337,500.00)
Dollars is hereby payable for the portion of the judgment against the state of Louisiana,
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-1538 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1014
through the Department of Transportation and Development, and in favor of Angela
Melerine.
Section 3. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of this Act, an amount equal to
the sum of Thirty-Seven Thousand Five Hundred and No/100 ($37,500.00) Dollars is hereby
payable for the portion of the judgment against the state of Louisiana, through the
Department of Transportation and Development, and in favor of Eric Melerine, Jr.
Section 4. A judgment may only be paid from this appropriation if it is final and shall
be paid as to principal, court costs, and expert witness fees as awarded in the judgment.
Interest shall be paid as provided by law and awarded in the judgment. If the provisions of
the judgment conflict with the provisions of this Act, the provisions of the judgment shall
be controlling. Any other provision of this Act not in conflict with the provisions of the
judgment shall control. Payment shall be made only after presentation to the state treasurer
of documentation required by the state treasurer. Further, the judgment shall be deemed to
have been paid on the effective date of this Act, and interest shall cease to run as of that date.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.